Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0185.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 part 1 line-item appropriations Sec. 101. There is appropriated for various state departments and agencies, the judicial branch, and the legislative branch to supplement appropriations for the fiscal year ending September 30, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 2025, from the following funds: APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 400 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 400 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 400 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF CIVIL RIGHTS APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 100 Sec. 103. DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 100 Sec. 104. JUDICIARY APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 100 Sec. 105. LEGISLATURE APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 100 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 general sections Sec. 201. Pursuant to section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, total state spending from state sources under part 1 for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025 is $400.00 and total state spending from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $0.00. Sec. 202. The appropriations made and expenditures authorized under this part and part 1 and the departments, commissions, boards, offices, and programs for which appropriations are made under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594.